Hawaii statutes.
§78-25 Credits for employees receiving
workers' compensation benefits; wage supplement. (a) Where an employee is
absent from work because of injuries incurred within the scope of the
employee's employment and the employee is receiving workers' compensation
benefits, the employee shall continue to earn vacation, sick leave, and
retirement credits as though the employee were not absent but performing duties
of the employee's regular employment. Section 386-57 or any other law to the
contrary notwithstanding, the employee shall have deducted from the employee's
workers' compensation benefit checks an amount calculated in the same manner as
if the employee were not absent but performing duties of the employee's regular
employment to be used as the employee's contribution to the retirement system.

(b) An employee who is receiving workers'
compensation wage loss replacement benefits may use the employee's accumulated
sick leave or vacation credits to supplement the workers' compensation wage
loss replacement benefits to a sum not to exceed the employee's regular salary.
[L 2000, c 253, pt of §74; am L 2015, c 86, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next